Illinois, session 104th, SB1304.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Reducing Barriers to Start Act. 6    Section 5. First year license or registration fees. 7Beginning January 1, 2026, this State and its agencies and 8institutions shall encourage the elimination of all first-year 9business fees relating to any license or registration for any 10new business or person establishing a new business, including 11home-based businesses, whose principal place of business is in 12this State.